North Dakota, session 69, HB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL - AUTONOMOUS
TECHNOLOGY GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the attorney general for the purpose of providing autonomous
technology grants to individuals or entities that aid the bureau of criminal investigation
in conducting missing person searches, crime scene reconstruction, and law
enforcement first response operations, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time
funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft
systems; autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or
technologies.
3. The attorney general shall develop an application process and guidelines for the
grants, including eligibility criteria, matching requirements, eligible uses of grant
Page No. 1 25.0756.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
funding, and maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant, an individual or entity
shall certify to the attorney general that the operation of the autonomous technology is
related to conducting missing person searches, crime scene reconstruction, and law
enforcement first response operations. The attorney general may require an individual
or entity to provide one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the
state. An individual or entity may use grant funding for autonomous technology
operations, contracting for services related to autonomous technology, or other eligible
uses as determined by the attorney general.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the attorney general shall provide at least one report to the
legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant recipients, the
amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION - AUTONOMOUS TECHNOLOGY GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT
TO LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of career and technical education for the purpose of
providing autonomous technology grants to a workforce training center serving the
northwest area of the state for providing workforce training to address workforce
shortages in the state, including shortages in the oil and gas industry for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this
section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft
systems; autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or
technologies.
3. The department of career and technical education shall develop an application
process and guidelines for the grants, including eligibility criteria, matching
requirements, eligible uses of grant funding, and maximum grant awards. To be
eligible for a grant, a workforce training center shall certify to the department of career
and technical education that the operation of the autonomous technology is related to
workforce training to address workforce shortages in the state, including shortages in
Page No. 2 25.0756.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the oil and gas industry. The department of career and technical education may
require a workforce training center to provide one dollar of matching funds for every
four dollars awarded by the state. A workforce training center may use grant funding
for education or training curriculum expenses related to autonomous technology,
autonomous technology operations, contracting for services related to autonomous
technology, or other eligible uses as determined by the department of career and
technical education.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of career and technical education shall
provide at least one report to the legislative management regarding the grants,
including a list of grant recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use
of the grant funding.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
AUTONOMOUS TECHNOLOGY GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO
LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose of
providing autonomous technology grants to individuals or entities that aid the functions
and operations of rural emergency response and disaster mitigation, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this
section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft
systems; autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or
technologies.
3. The department of health and human services shall develop an application process
and guidelines for the grants, including eligibility criteria, matching requirements,
eligible uses of grant funding, and maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant,
an individual or entity shall certify to the department of health and human services that
the operation of the autonomous technology is related to aiding the functions and
operations of rural emergency response and disaster mitigation. The department of
health and human services may require an individual or entity to provide one dollar of
Page No. 3 25.0756.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. An individual or entity may
use grant funding for autonomous technology operations, contracting for services
related to autonomous technology, or other eligible uses as determined by the
department of health and human services.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of health and human services shall
provide at least one report to the legislative management regarding the grants,
including a list of grant recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use
of the grant funding.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER - AUTONOMOUS
TECHNOLOGY GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the agriculture commissioner for the purpose of providing autonomous
technology grants to individuals or entities in the agriculture industry, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this
section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft
systems; autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or
technologies.
3. The agriculture commissioner shall develop an application process and guidelines for
the grants, including eligibility criteria, matching requirements, eligible uses of grant
funding, and maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant, an individual or entity
shall certify to the agriculture commissioner that the operation of the autonomous
technology is related to the inspection, operation, maintenance, or construction of
agriculture property or infrastructure. The agriculture commissioner may require an
individual or entity to provide one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars
awarded by the state. An individual or entity may use grant funding for autonomous
technology operations, contracting for services related to autonomous technology, or
other eligible uses as determined by the agriculture commissioner.
Page No. 4 25.0756.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the agriculture commissioner shall provide at least one
report to the legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant
recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES -
AUTONOMOUS TECHNOLOGY GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING - REPORT TO
LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $750,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of emergency services for the purpose of providing
autonomous technology grants to individuals or entities that monitor the United States
highway 2 corridor within the state to assist local and state law enforcement agencies,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding
provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft
systems; autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or
technologies.
3. The department of emergency services shall develop an application process and
guidelines for the grants, including eligibility criteria, matching requirements, eligible
uses of grant funding, and maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant, an
individual or entity shall certify to the department of emergency services that the
operation of the autonomous technology is related to monitoring the United States
highway 2 corridor within the state to assist local and state law enforcement agencies.
The department of emergency services may require an individual or entity to provide
one dollar of matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. An individual
or entity may use grant funding for autonomous technology operations, contracting for
services related to autonomous technology, or other eligible uses as determined by
the department of emergency services.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of emergency services shall provide at
least one report to the legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of
grant recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant
funding.
Page No. 5 25.0756.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - AUTONOMOUS TECHNOLOGY.
During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the costs and
benefits of investing in autonomous technology infrastructure in the state. The study must
include an analysis of the industries using autonomous technology, future industries that may
use autonomous technology, the economic impact of autonomous technology, and the return on
investment to the state. The legislative management shall report its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to
the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 6 25.0756.02000